en: Unknown
ar: غير معروف
bg: Неизвестно
cs: Neznámý, neznámá, neznámí, neznámé
da: Ukendt
de: Unbekannt
el: Άγνωστο, άγνωστη, άγνωστοι, άγνωστες
es: Desconocido, desconocida, desconocidos, desconocidas
et: Tundmatu
fi: Tuntematon
fr: Inconnu, inconnue, inconnus, inconnues
hu: Ismeretlen
it: Sconosciuto, sconosciuta, sconosciuti, sconosciute
ja: 不明
ko: 알 수 없음
lt: Nežinomas, nežinoma, nežinomi, nežinomos
lv: Nezināms, nezināma, nezināmi, nezināmas
nl: Onbekend
pl: Nieznany, nieznana, nieznani, nieznane
pt: Desconhecido, desconhecida, desconhecidos, desconhecidas
ro: Necunoscut, necunoscută, necunoscuți, necunoscute
ru: Неизвестно
sk: Neznámy, neznáma, neznámi, neznáme
sl: Neznano
sv: Okänd, okända
tr: Bilinmeyen
uk: Невідомо
zh: 未知

en: Plastic
ar: بلاستيك
be: пластма́са
bg: Пластмаса
ca: plàstic
cs: umělá hmota
da: plastik, plastic, plast, plaststof, formstof
de: Kunststoff, Kunstoff, plastik
el: πλαστικό
es: Plástico
et: plast
fi: Muovi
fr: Plastique
he: פלסטיק
hr: plastika
hu: Műanyag
is: plast
it: Plastica, plastiche, plastici
ja: プラスチック
ko: 플라스틱
lt: plastikas
lv: plastmasa
mk: пластика
nl: Plastic, Plastiek
no: plast
pl: Plastik, plastikowe
pt: Plástico
ru: Пластик
sk: plast
sl: plastika
sv: plast, plaster, plastic
tr: plastik
uk: пластма́са
zh: 塑料

en: soft plastic
da: blød plast, blød plastik
fi: pehmeä muovi
sv: mjukplast

en: hard plastic
da: hård plast, hård plastik
sv: hårdplast

en: composite material, Multilayer composite, multilayer, composite, composite materials, polycoat
ar: مادة مركبة
bg: композитен материал
ca: Material compost
da: Kompositmateriale
de: Verbundwerkstoff, Verbundstoff, Mehrschichtverbund, Mehrschicht, Verbundmaterial, Polycoat
es: material compuesto
et: Komposiitmaterjal
eu: Material konposatu
fi: komposiittimateriaali
fr: Composites multicouches, composites multi-couches, Composite Multicouches, composite multi-couches, multi-couches, multicouches
he: חומר מרוכב
hr: kompozitni materijal, višeslojne materijale, kompozitne
hu: kompozit anyag
it: materiale composito
ja: 複合材料
ko: 복합 재료
lv: kompozītmateriāli
mk: композитен материјал
nl: Composietmateriaal
nn: kompositt
pl: Materiał kompozytowy
pt: Compósito de várias camadas, compósito multi-camada, compósito
ro: material compozit
ru: композиционный материал
sk: kompozitný materiál
sl: Kompozit
sq: Material kompozit
sr: композитни материјал
sv: Kompositmaterial
tr: Kompozit malzemeler
uk: композиційний матеріал
zh: 复合材料

en: Recyclable material
ar: مادة قابلة للتدوير
bg: Рециклируем материал
ca: Material reciclable
da: Genanvendeligt materiale
de: wiederverwertbares Material
es: material reciclable
et: Töödeldav materjal
eu: Material birziklagarri
fi: Kierrätettävä materiaali
fr: Matériau recyclable
hr: Reciklabilni materijal
hu: Újrahasznosítható anyag
is: Endurvinnanlegt efni
it: Materiale riciclabile
ja: リサイクル可能な材料
ko: 재활용 가능한 재료
lt: Perdirbamas medžiaga
lv: Pārstrādājams materiāls
mk: Рециклирање на материјали
nl: Recycleerbaar materiaal
no: Resirkulerbart materiale
pl: Materiał nadający się do recyklingu
pt: Material reciclável
ro: Material reciclabil
ru: Перерабатываемый материал
sk: Recyklovateľný materiál
sl: Reciklabilni material
sq: Materiali i riciklueshëm
sr: Материјал за рециклирање
sv: Återvinningsbart material
tr: Geri dönüştürülebilir malzeme
uk: Перероблюваний матеріал

en: Recyclable plastic
bg: Рециклируема пластмаса
ca: Plàstic reciclable
da: Genanvendelig plastik
de: wiederverwertbarer Kunststoff
es: Plástico reciclable
et: Töödeldav plastik
eu: Plastiko birziklagarria
fi: Kierrätettävä muovi
fr: Plastique recyclable
hr: Reciklabilna plastika
hu: Újrahasznosítható műanyag
it: Plastica riciclabile
ja: プラマーク
lv: Pārstrādājama plastmasa
mk: Рециклирана пластика
nl: Recycleerbaar plastic, Recycleerbaar plastiek
nn: Resirkulerbar plast
pl: Plastik nadający się do recyklingu
pt: Plástico reciclável
ro: Plastic reciclabil
ru: Перерабатываемый пластик
sk: Recyklovateľný plast
sl: Reciklabilna plastika
sq: Plastika riciklueshme
sr: Reciklabilna plastika
sv: Återvinningsbar plast
tr: Geri dönüştürülebilir plastik
uk: Перероблюваний пластик
zh: 可回收塑料

en: Recycled material
ar: مادة معاد تدويرها
bg: Рециклиран материал
ca: Material reciclat
cs: Recyklovaný materiál
da: Genbrugt materiale
de: wiederverwertetes Material
el: Ανακυκλωμένο υλικό
es: Material reciclado
et: Taaskasutatud materjal
eu: Material birziklatua
fi: Kierrätetty materiaali
fr: Matériau recyclé
hr: Reciklirani materijal
hu: Újrahasznosított anyag, Újrahasznosított anyagból
it: Materiale riciclato
ja: リサイクル材
ko: 재활용 재료
lt: Perdirbta medžiaga
lv: Pārstrādāts materiāls
nl: Hergebruikt materiaal
pl: Materiał z recyklingu
pt: Material reciclado
ro: Material reciclat
ru: Переработанный материал
sk: Recyklovaný materiál
sl: Recikliran material
sq: Material i ricikluar
sv: Återvunnet material
tr: Geri dönüştürülmüş malzeme
uk: Перероблений матеріал
zh: 回收材料

en: Recycled plastic
ar: البلاستيك المعاد تدويره
bg: Рециклирана пластмаса
ca: Plàstic reciclat
cs: Recyklovaný plast
da: Genbrugt plastik
de: wiederverwerteter Kunststoff
el: Ανακυκλωμένο πλαστικό
es: Plástico reciclado
et: Taaskasutatud plast
fi: Kierrätetty muovi
fr: Plastique recyclé
hr: Reciklirana plastika
hu: Újrahasznosított műanyag, Újrahasznosított műanyagból
it: Plastica riciclata
ja: リサイクルプラスチック
ko: 재활용 플라스틱
lt: Perdirbtas plastikas
lv: Pārstrādāta plastmasa
nl: Hergebruikt plastic, Hergebruikt plastiek
pl: Plastik z recyklingu
pt: Plástico reciclado
ro: Plastic reciclat
ru: Переработанный пластик
sk: Recyklovaný plast
sl: Reciklirana plastika
sq: Plastikë e ricikluar
sv: Återvunnen plast
tr: Geri dönüştürülmüş plastik
uk: Перероблений пластик
zh: 再生塑料

en: Cellophane
bg: Целофан
fr: Cellophane
it: Cellophane, cellofan, cellofane, cellofano

en: Mixed plastics
ar: البلاستيك المختلط
bg: Смесени пластмаси
ca: Plàstics mixtos
cs: Směsné plasty
da: Blandet plastik
de: Mischkunststoffe
el: Μικτά πλαστικά
es: Plásticos mixtos
et: Segaplastid
eu: Plastiko mistoak
fi: Sekamuovit
fr: Plastiques mixtes
hr: Miješana plastika
hu: Kevert műanyagok
it: Plastica mista
ja: 混合プラスチック
ko: 혼합 플라스틱
lt: Mišrios plastmasės
lv: Jauktas plastmasas
nl: Gemengde plastics
pl: Tworzywa mieszane
pt: Plásticos misturados
ro: Materiale plastice amestecate
ru: Смешанные пластмассы
sk: Zmiešané plasty
sl: Mešana plastika
sq: Plastika të përziera
sr: Мешана пластика
sv: Blandade plaster
tr: Karışık plastikler
uk: Змішані пластмаси
zh: 混合塑料

en: PET 1 - Polyethylene terephthalate, PET - Polyethylene terephthalate, Polyethylene terephthalate
xx: PET, PET(E), PETE, PET 1, PET 01, 1 PET, 01 PET, ♳
bg: PET 1 - Полиетилентерефталат, PET - Полиетилентерефталат, Полиетилен терефталат
de: PET 1 - Polyethylenterephtalat, PET - Polyethylenterephtalat, Polyethylenterephtalat
fr: PET 1 - Polytéréphtalate d'éthylène, PET - Polytéréphtalate d'éthylène, Polytéréphtalate d'éthylène, polyéthylène téréphtalate
hr: PET 1 - polietilen tereftalat, PET - polietilen tereftalat, olietilen tereftalat
hu: PET 1 - Polietilén-tereftalát, PET - Polietilén-tereftalát, Polietilén-tereftalát
it: PET 1 - Polietilene tereftalato, PET - Polietilene tereftalato, Polietilene tereftalato, Polietilentereftalato
nl: PET 1 - Polyethyleentereftalaat, PET - Polyethyleentereftalaat, Polyethyleentereftalaat
pt: PET 1 - Tereftalato de polietileno, PET - Tereftalato de polietileno, Tereftalato de polietileno
ru: PET 1 - Полиэтилентерефталат, PET - Полиэтилентерефталат, Полиэтилентерефталат

en: PVDC 7 - Polyvinylidene chloride, PVDC - Polyvinylidene chloride, Polyvinylidene chloride
xx: PVDC, 07 PVDC, PVDC 07, 07PVDC, PVDC07, 7 PVDC, PVDC 7, 7PVDC, PVDC7
de: PVDC 7 - Polyvinylidenchlorid, PVDC - Polyvinylidenchlorid, Polyvinylidenchlorid
es: PVDC 7 - cloruro de polivinilideno, PVDC - Cloruro de polivinilideno, Cloruro de polivinilideno
fr: PVDC 7 - Chlorure de polyvinylidène, PVDC - Chlorure de polyvinylidène, Chlorure de polyvinylidène, Polychlorure de vinylidène, PVDC - Polychlorure de vinylidène
hu: PVDC 7 - polivinilidén-klorid, PVDC - polivinilidén-klorid, polivinilidén-klorid
it: PVDC 7 - Polivinildencloruro, PVDC - Polivinildencloruro, Polivinildencloruro
nl: PVDC 7 - Polyvinylidene chloride, PVDC - Polyvinylidene chloride, Polyvinylidene chloride
nn: PVDC 7 - polyvinylidenklorid, PDVC - polyvinylidenklorid, polyvinylidenklorid
ru: PVDC 7 - поливинилиденхлорид, PDVC -  поливинилиденхлорид, поливинилиденхлорид
sv: PVDC 7 - Polyvinylidenklorid, PDVC - Polyvinylidenklorid, Polyvinylidenklorid

en: rPET - Recycled Polyethylene terephthalate, Recycled PET, Recycled Polyethylene terephthalate
xx: rPET, r-PET
ar: rPET - بولي إيثيلين تيرفثالات معاد تدويره
bg: rPET - Рециклиран полиетилен терефталат
ca: rPET - Tereftalat de polietilè reciclat
cs: rPET - Recyklovaný polyethylentereftalát
da: rPET - Genanvendt polyethylenterephthalat
de: rPET - Wiederverwertetes PET
el: rPET - Ανακυκλωμένο τερεφθαλικό πολυαιθυλένιο
es: rPET - Tereftalato de polietileno reciclado
et: rPET - Taaskasutatud polüetüleentereftalaat
fi: rPET - Kierrätetty polyeteenitereftalaatti
fr: rPET - Polytéréphtalate d'éthylène recyclé, Polytéréphtalate d'éthylène recyclé, PET recyclé
hu: rPET - Újrahasznosított PET, Újrahasznosított PET, Újrahasznosított polietilén-tereftalát
it: rPET - Polietilene tereftalato riciclato, Polietilene tereftalato riciclato
ja: rPET - リサイクルポリエチレンテレフタレート
ko: rPET - 재활용 폴리에틸렌 테레프탈레이트
lt: rPET - Perdirbtas polietileno tereftalatas
lv: rPET - Pārstrādāts polietilēntereftalāts
nl: rPET - Hergebruikt Polyethyleentereftalaat, Hergebruikt Polyethyleentereftalaat
pl: rPET - Politereftalan etylenu z recyklingu
pt: rPET - Tereftalato de polietileno reciclado, PET reciclado, Tereftalato de polietileno reciclado
ro: rPET - Polietilen tereftalat reciclat
ru: rPET - Переработанный полиэтилентерефталат
sk: rPET - Recyklovaný polyetyléntereftalát
sl: rPET - Recikliran polietilen tereftalat
sv: rPET - Återvunnen polyetentereftalat
tr: rPET - Geri dönüştürülmüş Polietilen tereftalat
uk: rPET - Перероблений поліетилентерефталат
zh: rPET - 回收聚对苯二甲酸乙二醇酯

en: PETG- Polyethylene terephthalate glycol, Polyethylene terephthalate glycol, Glycolized Polyethylene terephthalate, Glycolised Polyethylene terephthalate
xx: PETG
fr: PETG - Polyéthylène téréphtalate glycolisé, Polyéthylène téréphtalate glycolisé

en: Silicone
xx: Silicone, Plastic / Silicone
de: Silikon, Kunststoff / Silikon
es: Silicona, Plástico / Silicona
fr: Silicone, Plastique / Silicone
it: Silicone, Plastica / Silicone
nl: Silicone, Kunststof / Silicone
pt: Silicone, Plástico / Silicone
sv: Silikon, Plast / Silikon

en: Biobased plastic
da: Biobaseret plastik
de: Biobasierter Kunststoff
es: Plástico de base biológica
fr: Plastique biosourcé, Plastiques / Autres plastiques Biosourcés (base amidon)
hu: Biobázisú műanyag
it: Plastica biologica, bioplastica
pt: Plástico biobaseado
sv: Biobaserad plast

en: bPET - Biobased PET, Biobased PET
xx: bPET, bio-PET
da: bPET - biobaseret PET, biobaseret PET
de: bPET - Biobasiertes PET, Biobasiertes PET
fr: bPET - PET biosourcé, PET biosourcé
hu: bPET - Biobázisú PET, Biobázisú PET
it: bPET - PET biologico, bioPET
nl: bPET - Biobased PET, Biobased PET
pt: bPET - Bioplástico PET, Bioplástico PET
sv: bPET - biobaserad PET, biobaserad PET

en: PET - Transparent, Clear PET, transparent PET
da: PET - gennemsigtig, gennemsigtig PET
de: PET - Transparentes
fr: PET - transparent
hu: PET - Átlátszó
it: PET - trasparente
nl: PET - transparant, Transparant PET
pt: PET - transparente
sv: PET - genomskinlig, genomskinlig PET

en: rPET - Transparent, Clear rPET, transparent RPET
ar: rPET - شفاف
bg: rPET - Прозрачен
ca: rPET - Transparent
cs: rPET - Transparentní
da: rPET - gennemsigtig, gennemsigtig rPET
de: rPET - Transparentes
el: rPET - Διαφανές
es: rPET - Transparente
et: rPET - Läbipaistev
fi: rPET - Läpinäkyvä
fr: rPET - transparent, rPET transparent, rPET clair
hr: rPET - Transparentan
hu: rPET - Átlátszó
it: rPET - trasparente
ja: rPET - 透明
ko: rPET - 투명한
lt: rPET - Skaidrus
lv: rPET - Caurspīdīgs
nl: rPET - transparant, Transparant rPET
pl: rPET - Przezroczysty
pt: rPET - transparente
ro: rPET - Transparent
ru: rPET - Прозрачный
sk: rPET - Priehľadný
sl: rPET - Transparenten
sq: rPET - Transparent
sv: rPET - genomskinlig, genomskinlig rPET
tr: rPET - Şeffaf
uk: rPET - Прозорий
zh: rPET - 透明